test/src/morphology/N-huonet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - huonet: # Noun 'borg' - full paradigm
     huonet+N+Sg+Nom: huonet
     huonet+N+Sg+Gen: huonheen
     huonet+N+Sg+Par: huonetta
     huonet+N+Sg+Tra: huonheeksi
     huonet+N+Sg+Abe: huonheetta
     huonet+N+Sg+Ine: huonheessa
     huonet+N+Sg+Ela: huonheesta
     huonet+N+Sg+Ill: huonheeseen
     huonet+N+Sg+Ade: huonheela
     huonet+N+Sg+Abl: huonheelta
     huonet+N+Sg+All: huonheele
     huonet+N+Sg+Ess: huonheena
     huonet+N+Pl+Nom: huonheet
     huonet+N+Pl+Gen: huonetjen
     huonet+N+Pl+Acc: huonheitten
     huonet+N+Pl+Par: huonheita
     huonet+N+Pl+Tra: huonheiksi
     huonet+N+Pl+Abe: huonheitta
     huonet+N+Pl+Com: huonetin
     huonet+N+Pl+Ine: huonheissa
     huonet+N+Pl+Ela: huonheista
     huonet+N+Pl+Ill: huonheissiin
     huonet+N+Pl+Ade: huonheila
     huonet+N+Pl+Abl: huonheilta
     huonet+N+Pl+All: huonheile
     huonet+N+Pl+Ess: huonheina
